Utah statutes.
39-1-8.   Governor may proclaim martial law.

Whenever the militia or any portion thereof, is called into active service, the governor may, by proclamation, declare all or any part of any county, city or town in which the troops are serving to be under martial law, and when the militia shall be on active service as herein provided, the commanding officer thereof and his subordinates may cooperate with the civil authorities or take entire charge of the situation as in the judgment of the commanding officer the exigencies of the case may require.



No Change Since 1953

